New York, session 2025-2026, A4896.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. The ordinance officers of the city of Mount Vernon police depart- 4 ment, when performing their duties as ordinance officers; provided, 5 however, that nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to authorize 6 such officer to carry, possess, repair or dispose of a firearm unless 7 the appropriate license therefor has been issued pursuant to section 8 400.00 of the penal law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07644-01-5